Maine, session 132, LD1862.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §1220 is enacted to read:
§1220. Jurisdiction
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, jurisdiction over sports wagering
conducted in person on the property of a facility operator is vested solely in the Gambling
Control Board established in section 1002.